Utah statutes.
62A-3-107.   Requirements for establishing division policy.
(1)  The board is the program policymaking body  for the division and for
programs funded with state and federal money under Sections 62A-3-104.1 and
62A-3-104.2.  In establishing policy and reviewing existing policy, the board
shall seek input from local area agencies, consumers, providers, advocates,
division staff, and other interested parties as determined by the board.
(2)  The board  shall establish, by rule, procedures for developing its
policies which ensure that local area agencies are given opportunity to
comment and provide input on any new policy of the board  and on any proposed
changes in the board's  existing policy.  The board  shall also provide a
mechanism for review of its existing policy and for consideration of policy
changes that are proposed by those local area agencies.
(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but, at the executive director's discretion, may receive per diem and
travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
